src/morphology/stems/numeral.lexc
LEXICON NUM_51yhdeksäntredekiljardia

+Pl+Abe:ittätredekiljardeitta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:iltätredekiljardeilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:illätredekiljardeilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:illetredekiljardeille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Com:inetredekiljardeine  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:istätredekiljardeista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:inätredekiljardeina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:ientredekiljardien  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ill:iintredekiljardeihin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:issätredekiljardeissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ins:intredekiljardein  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:ättredekiljardit  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:inätredekiljardeja  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:iksitredekiljardeiksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:ättätredekiljarditta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:ältätredekiljardilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:ällätredekiljardilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:älletredekiljardille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:ästätredekiljardista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:änätredekiljardina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:äntredekiljardin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ill:ääntredekiljardiin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:ässätredekiljardissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:äntredekiljardia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:äntredekiljardia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:äksitredekiljardiksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51yhdeksäntredekiljoonaa

+Pl+Abe:ittätredekiljoonitta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:iltätredekiljoonilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:illätredekiljoonilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:illetredekiljoonille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Com:inetredekiljoonine  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:istätredekiljoonista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:inätredekiljoonina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:ientredekiljoonien  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ill:iintredekiljooniin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:issätredekiljoonissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ins:intredekiljoonin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:ättredekiljoonat  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:inätredekiljoonia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:iksitredekiljooniksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:ättätredekiljoonatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:ältätredekiljoonalta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:ällätredekiljoonalla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:älletredekiljoonalle  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:ästätredekiljoonasta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:änätredekiljoonana  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:äntredekiljoonan  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ill:ääntredekiljoonaan  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:ässätredekiljoonassa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:äntredekiljoonaa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:äntredekiljoonaa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:äksitredekiljoonaksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51yhdeksäntriljardia

+Pl+Abe:ittätriljardeitta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:iltätriljardeilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:illätriljardeilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:illetriljardeille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Com:inetriljardeine  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:istätriljardeista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:inätriljardeina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:ientriljardien  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ill:iintriljardeihin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:issätriljardeissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ins:intriljardein  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:ättriljardit  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:inätriljardeja  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:iksitriljardeiksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:ättätriljarditta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:ältätriljardilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:ällätriljardilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:älletriljardille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:ästätriljardista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:änätriljardina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:äntriljardin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ill:ääntriljardiin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:ässätriljardissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:äntriljardia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:äntriljardia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:äksitriljardiksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51yhdeksäntriljoonaa

+Pl+Abe:ittätriljoonitta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:iltätriljoonilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:illätriljoonilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:illetriljoonille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Com:inetriljoonine  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:istätriljoonista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:inätriljoonina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:ientriljoonien  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ill:iintriljooniin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:issätriljoonissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ins:intriljoonin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:ättriljoonat  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:inätriljoonia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:iksitriljooniksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:ättätriljoonatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:ältätriljoonalta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:ällätriljoonalla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:älletriljoonalle  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:ästätriljoonasta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:änätriljoonana  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:äntriljoonan  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ill:ääntriljoonaan  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:ässätriljoonassa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:äntriljoonaa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:äntriljoonaa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:äksitriljoonaksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51yhdeksäntsiljardia

+Pl+Abe:ittätsiljardeitta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:iltätsiljardeilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:illätsiljardeilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:illetsiljardeille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Com:inetsiljardeine  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:istätsiljardeista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:inätsiljardeina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:ientsiljardien  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ill:iintsiljardeihin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:issätsiljardeissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ins:intsiljardein  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:ättsiljardit  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:inätsiljardeja  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:iksitsiljardeiksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:ättätsiljarditta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:ältätsiljardilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:ällätsiljardilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:älletsiljardille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:ästätsiljardista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:änätsiljardina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:äntsiljardin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ill:ääntsiljardiin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:ässätsiljardissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:äntsiljardia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:äntsiljardia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:äksitsiljardiksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51yhdeksäntsiljoonaa

+Pl+Abe:ittätsiljoonitta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:iltätsiljoonilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:illätsiljoonilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:illetsiljoonille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Com:inetsiljoonine  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:istätsiljoonista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:inätsiljoonina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:ientsiljoonien  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ill:iintsiljooniin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:issätsiljoonissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ins:intsiljoonin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:ättsiljoonat  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:inätsiljoonia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:iksitsiljooniksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:ättätsiljoonatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:ältätsiljoonalta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:ällätsiljoonalla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:älletsiljoonalle  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:ästätsiljoonasta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:änätsiljoonana  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:äntsiljoonan  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ill:ääntsiljoonaan  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:ässätsiljoonassa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:äntsiljoonaa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:äntsiljoonaa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:äksitsiljoonaksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

LEXICON NUMERAL
yhdeksäntredekiljardia+Num:yhdeks  NUM_51yhdeksäntredekiljardia  ;
yhdeksäntredekiljoonaa+Num:yhdeks  NUM_51yhdeksäntredekiljoonaa  ;
yhdeksäntriljardia+Num:yhdeks  NUM_51yhdeksäntriljardia  ;
yhdeksäntriljoonaa+Num:yhdeks  NUM_51yhdeksäntriljoonaa  ;
yhdeksäntsiljardia+Num:yhdeks  NUM_51yhdeksäntsiljardia  ;
yhdeksäntsiljoonaa+Num:yhdeks  NUM_51yhdeksäntsiljoonaa  ;
